examples/08_example.lexd
PATTERNS
Prepositions [<PRON><nom>:]
(NounStem [<N>:] NounInflection)[^[m,f]]
Rest

LEXICON Prepositions
я
ты
мы
вы

LEXICON NounStem
глагол[m]
класс[m]
рассказ[m]
россия:росси[f]

LEXICON NounInflection
<nom><sg>:[m]
<acc><sg>:[m]
<nom><sg>:я[f]
<acc><sg>:ю[f]
<gen><sg>:и[f]

LEXICON Rest
уныло<ADV>:уныло
а<CONJ>:а
о<PREP>:о
